Illinois, session 104th, SB3553.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $500,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to 7Treatment Alternatives for Stronger Communities (TASC) to 8support pursuit of certification as a Comprehensive Community 9Mental Health Center beginning with the TASC offices in 10Rockford and Peoria. The grant shall support a one-year 11implementation period with allowable expenses, including, but 12not limited to, cloud-based information technology services, 13expert consultation, staffing including management and 14supervisory staff, and provision of direct service to clients. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.